Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.030

Application for registration—Fee—Rules—Corrections—Amendment for change in categories—Certificates issued in error.

(1) Subject to the limitations set forth in this chapter, any person who has adopted and is using a trademark in this state may file in the office of the secretary of state, on a form to be furnished by the secretary of state, an application for registration of that trademark setting forth, but not limited to, the following information:

(a) The name and business address of the applicant, and, if the applicant is a corporation, its state of incorporation;

(b) The particular goods or services in connection with which the trademark is used and the class in which such goods or services fall;

(c) The manner in which the trademark is placed on or affixed to the goods or containers, or displayed in connection with such goods, or used in connection with the sale or advertising of the services;

(d) The date when the trademark was first used with such goods or services anywhere and the date when it was first used with such goods or services in this state by the applicant or his or her predecessor in business;

(e) A statement that the trademark is presently in use in this state by the applicant;

(f) A statement that the applicant believes himself or herself to be the owner of the trademark and believes that no other person has the right to use such trademark in connection with the same or similar goods or services in this state either in the identical form or in such near resemblance thereto as to be likely, when used on or in connection with the goods or services of such other person, to cause confusion or mistake or to deceive; and

(g) Such additional information or documents as the secretary of state may reasonably require.

(2) A single application for registration of a trademark may specify all goods or services in a single class or in multiple classes for which the trademark is actually being used.

(3) The application must be signed by the applicant individual, or by a member of the applicant firm, or by an officer of the applicant corporation, association, union, or other organization.

(4) The application must be accompanied by three specimens or facsimiles of the trademark for each of the goods or services for which its registration is requested, and a filing fee, as set by rule by the secretary of state, payable to the secretary of state. The fee established by the secretary may vary based upon the number of categories listed in the application.

(5) An applicant may correct an application previously filed by the secretary of state, within ninety days of the original filing, if the application contains an incorrect statement or the application was defectively executed, signed, or acknowledged. An application is corrected by filing a form provided by the secretary of state, and accompanied by a filing fee established by the secretary by rule. The correction may not change the mark itself. A corrected application is effective on the effective date of the document it corrects, except that it is effective on the date the correction is filed as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction.

(6) An applicant may amend an application previously filed by the secretary of state if the applicant changes the categories in which it does business. An application is amended by filing a form provided by the secretary of state, accompanied by three specimens or facsimiles of the trademark for any new or additional goods or services for which the amendment is requested, and a filing fee established by the secretary by rule. The amendment or correction may not change the mark itself. An amended application is effective on the date it is filed.

(7) If the secretary of state determines within ninety days of issuance, that a certificate of registration was issued in error, then the secretary may cancel the certificate of registration. The secretary shall promptly notify the registrant of the cancellation in writing. The registrant may petition the superior court of Thurston county for review of the cancellation within sixty days.

[ 2011 c 336 s 551; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 9; 1998 c 39 s 1; 1994 c 60 s 1; 1989 c 72 s 3; 1982 c 35 s 181; 1955 c 211 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.